Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1458.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Accessibility to Shopping Cart Corrals Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Parking area." A lot or other property provided by a retail establishment for the use of customers to park automobiles or other vehicles while doing business in that establishment."Shopping cart." A basket which is mounted on wheels, or a similar device, generally used in a retail establishment by a customer for the purpose of transporting goods of any kind.123456789101112131415161718 Section 3. Duty to place shopping cart corrals near parking spaces reserved for individuals with disabilities.(a) Duty.--A retail establishment that provides shopping carts for use by customers shall place a shopping cart corral or cart collection system in the retail establishment's parking area within 20 feet of each parking space reserved for individuals with disabilities as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327).(b) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a retail establishment from relocating a shopping cart corral or cart collection system constructed before the effective date of this subsection or constructing an additional shopping cart corral or cart collection system on or after the effective date of this subsection to comply with the requirements of subsection (a).Section 4. Enforcement.An individual aggrieved by a violation of section 3(a) may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce compliance with section 3(a) and obtain injunctive relief or other appropriate relief.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1458PN1711 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122